California, session 20252026, SB380.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6608.9 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:6608.9. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the State Department of State Hospitals shall conduct an analysis of the benefits and feasibility of establishing transitional housing facilities for the conditional release program, and submit the findings of the analysis in a report to the Legislature.(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to ensure the placement of sexually violent predators in the conditional release program and to protect the public at the earliest possible time, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.